Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-502
Prohibited acts during closed season.

Except as otherwise provided by the Game Law, it shall be unlawful to take any species of wildlife protected by the Game Law except during the open seasons established pursuant to section 37-314.

Laws 1929, c. 112, III, § 5, p. 417;

C.S.1929, § 37-305;

Laws 1931, c. 71, § 1, p. 191;

Laws 1933, c. 67, § 1, p. 305;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 8, p. 294;

Laws 1939, c. 42, § 1, p. 200;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-305;

Laws 1943, c. 94, § 6, p. 325;

R.S.1943, § 37-304;

Laws 1945, c. 78, § 4, p. 290;

Laws 1945, c. 79, § 1(1), p. 295;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-304;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 222.